Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-514.01
Service on
agent.

Any party may be served by personal, residence, certified mail, or designated delivery service
upon an agent authorized by appointment or by law to receive service of process.

Laws 1983, LB 447, § 31;

Laws 2011, LB669, § 16.